Idaho, session 2026, H0656.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 1, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-144, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-144. STUDENT IMMIGRATION STATUS AND NATIONALITY IN IDAHO PUBLIC
EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTIONS -- DATA COLLECTION. (1) It is the intent of the leg-
islature to collect aggregated immigration data for Idaho students to enable
the legislature to estimate more accurately the cost of educating Idaho stu-
dents and to illustrate the financial impact that federal immigration policy
has on the state of Idaho.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Aggregated data" has the same meaning as that term is defined in
section 33-133, Idaho Code.
(b) "Immigration status" means an individual's legal status in the
United States as governed by the United States immigration and nation-
ality act, including:
(i) An individual who is a lawful permanent resident who is "law-
fully admitted for permanent residence" as that term is defined in
8 U.S.C. 1101(20);
(ii) An individual who is a "national of the United States" as that
term is defined in 8 U.S.C. 1101(22);
(iii) An individual who is a "qualified alien" as that term is de-
fined in 8 U.S.C. 1641; and
(iv) An individual who is a non-qualified alien. For purposes
of this section, "non-qualified alien" means an individual who is
unauthorized and not lawfully admitted into the United States.
(c) "Public institution of higher education" means any state univer-
sity, college, or community college in the state of Idaho.
(d) "School district" has the same meaning as that term is defined in
section 33-133, Idaho Code.
(3) The Idaho state board of education shall collect from all public
institutions of higher education, charter schools, and school districts
aggregated data regarding the immigration status, nationality, and primary
language of all enrolled students. Such data shall be subject to the data


protection and privacy requirements provided for in section 33-133, Idaho
Code.
(4) The collection of aggregated student data regarding immigration
status, nationality, and primary language provided for under the provisions
of this section shall be for the purpose of analyzing data only. Such student
data shall not be used to discriminate against any student in any manner.
All student data collected pursuant to the provisions of this section and
reported to the state board of education shall be aggregated data.
(5) The state board of education shall submit an annual report to the
legislature including the aggregated data collected pursuant to the provi-
sions of this section.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.